Maryland, session 2026, HB1339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
5–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “ATTORNEY GENERAL” MEANS THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL’S DESIGNEE.
[(b)] (C) “Board” means the Handgun Roster Board.
(D) “EXEMPLAR” MEANS A FIREARM, FIREARM PART, OR
MANUFACTURER–PROVIDED SAMPLE OF A FIREARM OR FIREARM PART SUBMITTED
FOR PURPOSES OF TECHNICAL INSPECTION AND COMPARISON.
[(c)] (E) (1) “Handgun” means a pistol, a revolver, or any other firearm
capable of being concealed on the person.
(2) “Handgun” does not include a shotgun, a rifle, a short–barreled rifle, a
short–barreled shotgun, or an antique firearm.
[(d)] (F) “Handgun roster” means the roster of authorized handguns compiled
by the Board under § 5–405 of this subtitle.
[(e)] (G) “Secretary” means the Secretary of State Police or the Secretary’s
designee.
5–402.
(a) This subtitle does not affect a person’s right to:
(1) manufacture, sell, or offer to sell a rifle or other weapon that is not
defined as a handgun in § 4–201 of the Criminal Law Article;

HOUSE BILL 1339 3
(2) manufacture a prototype handgun model required for design,
development, testing, and approval by the Board; and
(3) manufacture in this State a handgun that is not on the handgun roster
by a federally licensed gun manufacturer who is also licensed as a regulated firearms dealer
in this State for direct sale to a unit of:
(i) the federal government;
(ii) a state other than this State;
(iii) a local government in a state other than this State; or
(iv) a law enforcement agency in a state other than this State.
(b) (1) A person is not strictly liable for damages for injuries to another that
result from the criminal use of a firearm by a third person.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply if the person conspired
with the third person to commit the criminal act in which the firearm was used or willfully
aided, abetted, or caused the commission of the criminal act in which the firearm was used.
(3) This subtitle does not otherwise negate, limit, or modify the doctrine of
negligence or strict liability that relates to abnormally dangerous products or activities and
defective products.
[5–403.
The Secretary shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out this subtitle.]
5–403.
(A) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL APPROVE THE PLACEMENT OF
A HANDGUN ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER UNDER § 5–405 OF THIS SUBTITLE ON THE
SUCCESSFUL PETITION OF ANY PERSON, SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF
THIS SECTION.
(2) A PETITION TO PLACE A HANDGUN ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER
SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IN WRITING IN THE FORM AND
MANNER THAT THE ATTORNEY GENERAL REQUIRES.
(3) A PERSON WHO PETITIONS FOR PLACEMENT OF A HANDGUN ON
THE HANDGUN ROSTER HAS THE BURDEN OF PROVING TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
THAT THE HANDGUN SHOULD BE PLACED ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER.

HOUSE BILL 1339
(B) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL:
(1) CONDUCT A LEGAL REVIEW OF EACH PETITION TO PLACE A
HANDGUN ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER, AS WELL AS ANY MATERIALS AND
INFORMATION PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) DETERMINE WHETHER THE HANDGUN IS LAWFUL UNDER STATE
AND FEDERAL LAW FOR PLACEMENT ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER.
(C) BEFORE A HANDGUN IS PLACED ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER, THE
HANDGUN SHALL PASS TESTING UNDER § 5–403.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) (1) A PETITIONER SHALL PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING MATERIALS AND
INFORMATION TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL WITH A PETITION:
(I) THE HANDGUN MARKINGS, INCLUDING:
1. THE SERIAL NUMBER;
2. THE MANUFACTURER;
3. THE MODEL; AND
4. THE CALIBER;
(II) AN EXEMPLAR OR, IF AN EXEMPLAR IS NOT AVAILABLE, A
REPRESENTATIVE MODEL OR DETAILED MANUFACTURER TECHNICAL
SPECIFICATIONS OF THE HANDGUN;
(III) ANY MANUFACTURER REPRESENTATIONS, INCLUDING ANY
STATEMENTS OF FACT OR PROMISES MADE BY THE MANUFACTURER ABOUT THE
HANDGUN; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REQUESTED BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) AND (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL HAVE 45 DAYS TO COMPLETE THE
REVIEW OF A PETITION UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) THE REVIEW PERIOD SHALL BE TOLLED WHILE
REASONABLE REQUESTS FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION ARE PENDING, INCLUDING
TESTING REPORT RESULTS UNDER § 5–403.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1339 5
(III) THE REVIEW PERIOD MAY BE EXTENDED FOR GOOD CAUSE
AT THE DISCRETION OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(E) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL CONSIDER CAREFULLY EACH OF THE
FOLLOWING CHARACTERISTICS OF A HANDGUN WITHOUT PLACING UNDUE WEIGHT
ON ANY ONE CHARACTERISTIC IN DETERMINING WHETHER ANY HANDGUN SHOULD
BE PLACED ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER:
(1) CONCEALABILITY;
(2) BALLISTIC ACCURACY;
(3) WEIGHT;
(4) QUALITY OF MATERIALS;
(5) QUALITY OF MANUFACTURE;
(6) RELIABILITY AS TO SAFETY;
(7) CALIBER;
(8) DETECTABILITY BY THE STANDARD SECURITY EQUIPMENT THAT
IS COMMONLY USED AT AN AIRPORT OR A COURTHOUSE AND THAT IS APPROVED BY
THE FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION FOR USE AT AIRPORTS IN THE UNITED
STATES; AND
(9) UTILITY FOR LEGITIMATE SPORTING ACTIVITIES,
SELF–PROTECTION, OR LAW ENFORCEMENT.
(F) (1) AFTER THE REVIEW OF THE PETITION IS COMPLETED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ISSUE A
WRITTEN DETERMINATION TO THE BOARD AND PETITIONER REGARDING WHETHER
THE HANDGUN IS LAWFUL UNDER STATE AND FEDERAL LAW FOR PLACEMENT ON
THE HANDGUN ROSTER.
(2) THE WRITTEN DETERMINATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A STATEMENT AS TO WHETHER THE HANDGUN IS LAWFUL TO
BE PLACED ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER UNDER STATE AND FEDERAL LAW;

HOUSE BILL 1339
(II) THE SUPPORTING LEGAL ANALYSIS FOR THE APPROVAL OR
DENIAL OF PLACEMENT OF THE HANDGUN ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER; AND
(III) IF THE DETERMINATION IS A DENIAL OF PLACEMENT OF
THE HANDGUN ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER, WHETHER REMEDIATION IS AVAILABLE.
(G) THE BOARD SHALL RECEIVE THE WRITTEN DETERMINATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION SOLELY FOR PURPOSES OF PROCEDURAL
OVERSIGHT TO COMPILE AND MAINTAIN A HANDGUN ROSTER UNDER § 5–405 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(H) (1) (I) ANY MATERIALS PROVIDED TO THE BOARD UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY BE DESIGNATED AS CONFIDENTIAL BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(II) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DESIGNATES MATERIALS AS
CONFIDENTIAL UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH, THE MATERIALS SHALL BE KEPT
CONFIDENTIAL BY ALL BOARD MEMBERS, STAFF MEMBERS, AND COUNSEL.
(2) (I) ANY BOARD MEMBER, STAFF MEMBER, OR COUNSEL WITH
ACCESS TO CONFIDENTIAL MATERIALS SHALL COMPLY WITH ALL APPLICABLE
CONFIDENTIALITY, CONFLICT OF INTEREST, AND SELF–RECUSAL RULES.
(II) THE FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH A RULE RELATING TO
CONFIDENTIAL MATERIALS SUBJECTS A BOARD MEMBER, STAFF MEMBER, OR
COUNSEL TO DISCIPLINE AND ANY OTHER CONSEQUENCES AS PROVIDED BY LAW.
(I) (1) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DENIES THE PLACEMENT OF A
HANDGUN ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER AFTER THE REVIEW OF A PETITION, THE
HANDGUN MAY NOT BE PLACED ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER UNTIL THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL ISSUES A SUBSEQUENT WRITTEN DETERMINATION THAT THE DEFICIENCY
HAS BEEN REMEDIED AND THE HANDGUN IS LAWFUL UNDER STATE AND FEDERAL
LAW FOR PLACEMENT ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY LIMIT THE NUMBER OF TIMES A
PETITIONER MAY FILE A RESUBMISSION TO PLACE A HANDGUN ON THE HANDGUN
ROSTER UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(J) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE BOARD, SHALL
PUBLISH ONLINE ALL FINAL DETERMINATIONS MADE UNDER THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING THE SUPPORTING LEGAL ANALYSIS FOR THE APPROVAL OR DENIAL OF
PLACEMENT OF THE HANDGUN ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER.

HOUSE BILL 1339 7
(K) ANY PETITIONER WHO IS AGGRIEVED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY
APPEAL WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER A FINAL DECISION OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IN
ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(L) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
MARYLAND STATE POLICE AND THE BOARD, SHALL:
(I) REEVALUATE ALL HANDGUNS THAT WERE APPROVED TO BE
ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, TO DETERMINE WHETHER
THEY ARE STILL LEGAL UNDER STATE AND FEDERAL LAW; AND
(II) ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(2) ANY PETITION TO PLACE A HANDGUN ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER
FILED ON OR BEFORE AND PENDING AS OF OCTOBER 1, 2026, SHALL BE
ADJUDICATED UNDER THE PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
(M) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT
THIS SECTION.
5–403.1.
(A) THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION IS TO ENSURE THAT HANDGUNS
SUBMITTED FOR CONSIDERATION FOR PLACEMENT ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SATISFY CERTAIN SAFETY AND FUNCTIONALITY
REQUIREMENTS.
(B) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY REQUEST THAT THE MARYLAND
STATE POLICE TEST A HANDGUN TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE HANDGUN IS SAFE
AND FUNCTIONAL.
(2) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL REQUESTS TESTING UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE SHALL:
(I) CONDUCT THE TESTING; OR
(II) CONTRACT WITH AN INDEPENDENT ACCREDITED TESTING
LABORATORY TO CONDUCT THE TESTING.
(3) IF THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE CONTRACT WITH AN
INDEPENDENT ACCREDITED TESTING LABORATORY TO CONDUCT THE TESTING

HOUSE BILL 1339
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL REVIEW THE
AGREEMENT.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, TESTING UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONDUCTED ON ONE SPECIMEN OF THE HANDGUN.
(2) THE SPECIMEN SHALL BE SOURCED UNDER DOCUMENTED
CHAIN–OF–CUSTODY RULES ESTABLISHED BY THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE.
(3) THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE MAY REQUIRE THAT THE
SPECIMEN BE PROCURED FROM A COMMERCIAL DISTRIBUTION CENTER TO
MINIMIZE THE RISK OF PRE–TEST SELECTION BIAS.
(D) (1) THE TESTING UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) FUNCTION TESTING, INCLUDING AT LEAST 500
CONTINUOUS ROUNDS OF LIVE FIRE USING COMMERCIAL FACTORY AMMUNITION
THAT IS APPROPRIATE FOR THE HANDGUN, WITHOUT CLEANING OR MAINTENANCE
TO CLEAR ANY MALFUNCTION DURING THE ENTIRE SEQUENCE OF LIVE FIRE;
(II) DROP AND IMPACT TESTING:
1. IN MULTIPLE SETTINGS;
2. AT MULTIPLE HEIGHTS; AND
3. WITH DIFFERENT SURFACE CONDITIONS;
(III) EVALUATION OF THE SAFETY MECHANISMS;
(IV) ENVIRONMENTAL AND MECHANICAL INTEGRITY TESTING;
AND
(V) MINIMUM FUNCTION TEST PARAMETERS WITH PASS OR FAIL
THRESHOLDS.
(2) A SPECIMEN SHALL FAIL THE FUNCTION TESTING UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE SPECIMEN EXPERIENCES MORE
THAN SIX MALFUNCTIONS DURING THE 500–ROUND TEST.
(3) A SPECIMEN SHALL FAIL THE DROP AND IMPACT TESTING UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE SPECIMEN DISCHARGES AS A
RESULT OF THE DROP AND IMPACT TESTING.

HOUSE BILL 1339 9
(4) ANY UNINTENDED DISCHARGE OR MECHANICAL FAILURE OF A
SPECIMEN DURING ANY OF THE TESTING UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL CONSTITUTE AN AUTOMATIC FAILURE FOR THE SPECIMEN.
(E) THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE MAY REQUIRE ADDITIONAL SPECIMENS
FOR TESTING UNDER THIS SECTION IF:
(1) PRODUCT VARIABILITY IS SUSPECTED;
(2) THERE ARE ANOMALOUS TEST RESULTS; OR
(3) THERE ARE CREDIBLE SAFETY CONCERNS.
(F) (1) THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE, OR THE INDEPENDENT
ACCREDITED TESTING LABORATORY IF RETAINED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, SHALL PREPARE A WRITTEN TEST REPORT DOCUMENTING THE TEST
RESULTS UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) EACH TEST REPORT SHALL:
(I) IDENTIFY THE SPECIMEN TESTED;
(II) IDENTIFY THE AMMUNITION USED;
(III) DESCRIBE THE SEQUENCE OF TESTS ADMINISTERED;
(IV) DESCRIBE ANY MALFUNCTIONS;
(V) LIST ANY DISCHARGES;
(VI) CONTAIN PHOTOGRAPHS AND VIDEOS OF ANY FAILURES;
AND
(VII) STATE A PASS OR FAIL DETERMINATION FOR THE
SPECIMEN.
(G) (1) THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE SHALL PROVIDE THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL AND THE BOARD WITH:
(I) EACH TEST REPORT COMPLETED UNDER THIS SECTION;
AND

HOUSE BILL 1339
(II) WRITTEN NOTICE IF A HANDGUN FAILS TESTING,
INCLUDING THE REASON FOR THE FAILURE.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
HANDGUN THAT FAILS TESTING UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE REMEDIATED BY THE
PETITIONER AND RESUBMITTED FOR A RETEST.
(II) IF A HANDGUN FAILS TESTING UNDER THIS SECTION, A
PETITIONER MAY NOT REFILE A PETITION FOR THE SAME HANDGUN FOR 2 YEARS
FROM THE DATE OF THE FAIL DETERMINATION MADE BY THE MARYLAND STATE
POLICE OR THE INDEPENDENT ACCREDITED TESTING LABORATORY UNLESS THE
PETITIONER SUBMITS DOCUMENTATION OF A MATERIAL DESIGN OR
MANUFACTURING CHANGE.
(H) IF A HANDGUN FAILS TESTING UNDER THIS SECTION, THE HANDGUN
MAY NOT BE PLACED ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER UNDER § 5–405 OF THIS SUBTITLE
UNLESS AND UNTIL THE HANDGUN PASSES TESTING.
(I) THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE MAY COORDINATE TESTING WITH THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL, THE BOARD, AND ANY OTHER ENTITIES THE MARYLAND
STATE POLICE CONSIDERS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
SECTION.
(J) (1) HANDGUNS THAT ARE LISTED ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER AS OF
OCTOBER 1, 2026, SHALL BE TESTED BY THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE ON OR
BEFORE MARCH 31, 2028.
(2) THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE SHALL WORK WITH THE BOARD
AND MANUFACTURERS TO SCHEDULE TESTING UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(K) THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION THAT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) TESTING PROTOCOLS AND PARAMETERS;
(2) ACCREDITATION STANDARDS FOR LABORATORIES;
(3) CHAIN–OF–CUSTODY PROCEDURES FOR OBTAINING SPECIMENS
OF HANDGUNS;
(4) OBTAINING ADDITIONAL SPECIMENS;

HOUSE BILL 1339 11
(5) REASONABLE LIMITS ON THE NUMBER AND TIMING OF RETESTS;
(6) REASONABLE FEES FOR TESTING AND RETESTING; AND
(7) ANY OTHER RELEVANT MATTERS.
5–404.
(a) There is a Handgun Roster Board in the Department of State Police.
(b) (1) The Board consists of 11 members.
(2) Of the 11 members of the Board:
(i) one shall be the Secretary as an ex officio member;
(ii) ten shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and
consent of the Senate; and
(iii) all shall be Maryland residents.
(3) Of the ten appointed members of the Board:
(i) one shall be a representative of the Association of Chiefs of
Police;
(ii) one shall be a representative of the Maryland State’s Attorneys’
Association;
(iii) one shall be a handgun dealer, gunsmith, or representative of a
handgun manufacturer;
(iv) one shall be a resident of the State who is a [representative of
the National Rifle Association or its affiliated State association] HANDGUN OWNER OR A
REPRESENTATIVE OF AN ORGANIZATION THAT ADVOCATES ON BEHALF OF
HANDGUN OWNERS, INCLUDING ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROMOTE RESPONSIBLE
FIREARM OWNERSHIP, FIREARM SAFETY, RANGE INSTRUCTION, OR SECOND
AMENDMENT RIGHTS;
(v) one shall be a representative of an organization that advocates
against handgun violence; and
(vi) five shall be public members, two of whom shall be mechanical
or electrical engineers.
(c) The term of an appointed member is 4 years.

HOUSE BILL 1339
(d) The Secretary shall serve as chairman.
(e) The Board shall meet at the request of the chairman or of a majority of the
members.
(F) THE SECRETARY SHALL PROVIDE REASONABLE STAFFING, INCLUDING
AN EXECUTIVE SECRETARY AND ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT, TO THE BOARD.
5–405.
(a) THE PURPOSE OF THIS SECTION IS TO DEFINE THE BOARD’S ROLE AS A
PROCEDURAL OVERSIGHT BODY OF THE HANDGUN ROSTER.
(B) (1) The Board shall:
[(1)] (I) compile and maintain a handgun roster of authorized handguns
that are useful for legitimate sporting, self–protection, or law enforcement purposes IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE FINAL DETERMINATIONS BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
UNDER § 5–403 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
[(2)] (II) annually publish the handgun roster in the Maryland Register;
and
[(3)] (III) semiannually send a copy of the handgun roster to all persons
who hold a State regulated firearm dealer’s license under Subtitle 1 of this title.
(2) WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF A FINAL DETERMINATION BY
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER § 5–403 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE BOARD SHALL
UPDATE THE HANDGUN ROSTER UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
[(b) The Board shall consider carefully each of the following characteristics of a
handgun without placing undue weight on any one characteristic in determining whether
any handgun should be placed on the handgun roster:
(1) concealability;
(2) ballistic accuracy;
(3) weight;
(4) quality of materials;
(5) quality of manufacture;
(6) reliability as to safety;

HOUSE BILL 1339 13
(7) caliber;
(8) detectability by the standard security equipment that is commonly used
at an airport or courthouse and that is approved by the Federal Aviation Administration
for use at airports in the United States; and
(9) utility for legitimate sporting activities, self–protection, or law
enforcement.]
(c) (1) The Board may NOT:
(I) place a handgun on the handgun roster on its own initiative; OR
(II) MAKE ANY DETERMINATION REGARDING THE LAWFULNESS,
SAFETY, OR FUNCTIONALITY OF A HANDGUN.
[(2) The Board shall place a handgun on the handgun roster on the
successful petition of any person subject to subsections (d) and (e) of this section, unless a
court, after all appeals are exhausted, has made a finding that the decision of the Board
shall be affirmed.
(3) A petition to place a handgun on the handgun roster shall be submitted
to the Board in writing in the form and manner that the Board requires.
(4) A person who petitions for placement of a handgun on the handgun
roster has the burden of proving to the Board that the handgun should be placed on the
handgun roster.]
(2) A HANDGUN SHALL BE PLACED ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER UNDER
THIS SECTION ONLY IF:
(I) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES THE HANDGUN IS
LAWFUL TO BE PLACED ON THE HANDGUN ROSTER UNDER § 5–403 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(II) THE HANDGUN PASSES REQUIRED TESTING UNDER §
5–403.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(d) (1) Within 45 days after receipt of a petition to place a handgun on the
handgun roster, the Board shall:
(i) deny the petition in writing, stating the reasons for denial; or

HOUSE BILL 1339
(ii) approve the petition and publish a description of the handgun in
the Maryland Register, including notice that any objection to the handgun’s inclusion on
the handgun roster shall be filed with the Board within 30 days.
(2) If the Board fails to deny or approve a petition within the time required
under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the petition shall be considered denied.
(e) (1) If the Board denies a petition to place a handgun on the handgun roster,
the Board shall notify the petitioner by certified mail, return receipt requested.
(2) The petitioner may request a hearing within 15 days after the date that
the Board’s denial letter is received.
(3) (i) If the petitioner requests a hearing under paragraph (2) of this
subsection, within a reasonable time not to exceed 90 days after receiving the request, the
Board shall:
1. hold a hearing on the petition; and
2. issue a written final decision on the petition.
(ii) The Board shall provide notice of the hearing in accordance with
Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article.
(iii) At a hearing held under this paragraph, the petitioner has the
burden of proving to the Board that the handgun should be placed on the handgun roster
because the handgun is useful for legitimate sporting activities, self–protection, or law
enforcement purposes.
(4) Any party of record who is aggrieved may appeal within 30 days after a
final decision of the Board in accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government
Article.
(f) This section does not require the Board to test any handgun or have any
handgun tested at the expense of the Board.]
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, THE BOARD SHALL
SUBMIT TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE SECRETARY A RECOMMENDED FEE
SCHEDULE FOR HANDGUN ROSTER PETITIONS, PROCESSING, TESTING, AND
RETESTING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE BOARD’S RECOMMENDATIONS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE BASED ON:

HOUSE BILL 1339 15
(I) ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS, INCLUDING PROCESSING
PETITIONS, STAFF REVIEW, AND RECORD–KEEPING REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(II) THE REASONABLE AND NECESSARY COSTS OF REQUIRED
SAFETY AND FUNCTIONALITY TESTING UNDER § 5–403.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
SECRETARY, SHALL CONSIDER THE BOARD’S RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE FEE
SCHEDULES AND MAY ADOPT, MODIFY, OR REJECT THE RECOMMENDATIONS.
(E) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, THE BOARD, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE SECRETARY, SHALL
SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A SUMMARY OF ALL PETITIONS RECEIVED DURING THE
YEAR;
(II) ALL FINAL DETERMINATIONS RENDERED UNDER § 5–403 OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(III) ALL TESTING REPORTS UNDER § 5–403.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
INCLUDING:
1. PASS OR FAIL DETERMINATIONS;
2. SUMMARY MALFUNCTION DATA;
3. OBSERVED TRENDS AND EMERGENT TECHNOLOGIES;
AND
4. ANY BOARD RECOMMENDATIONS FOR STATUTORY,
REGULATORY, OR PROCEDURAL CHANGES TO THE HANDGUN ROSTER PROCESS
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE BOARD, THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL, OR THE SECRETARY DETERMINES TO BE APPROPRIATE.
(F) THE BOARD SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1339
(1) (I) REGULARLY MONITOR, REVIEW, AND AUDIT FOR
COMPLIANCE ANY REPORTS, TESTING, CHAIN–OF–CUSTODY PRACTICES, ROSTER
ADMINISTRATION, AND ANY OTHER PROCESSES UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) REPORT ANY SIGNIFICANT PROCEDURAL NONCOMPLIANCE
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO THE APPROPRIATE OVERSIGHT AUTHORITIES FOR
FURTHER INVESTIGATION OR ENFORCEMENT ACTION;
(2) PROVIDE PUBLIC EDUCATION ABOUT THE HANDGUN ROSTER
PROCESS BY HOLDING STAKEHOLDER BRIEFINGS AND SOLICITING INPUT FROM
MANUFACTURERS, PUBLIC SAFETY ORGANIZATIONS, PUBLIC INTEREST GROUPS,
AND ANY OTHER RELEVANT PARTIES;
(3) ENSURE ALL BOARD MEMBERS RECEIVE AN ORIENTATION AND
ANNUAL TRAINING ON:
(I) THE SCOPE OF AUTHORITY FOR THE BOARD UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE;
(II) THE SCOPE OF AUTHORITY FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
AND THE SECRETARY UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(III) THE SCOPE OF AUTHORITY FOR THE MARYLAND STATE
POLICE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(IV) THE DISTINCTION BETWEEN THE OVERSIGHT FUNCTIONS
OF THE BOARD AND THE DETERMINATIONS MADE UNDER §§ 5–403 AND 5–403.1 OF
THIS SUBTITLE AND ANY APPLICABLE REGULATIONS; AND
(4) HAVE ACCESS TO LEGAL COUNSEL PROVIDED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL OR OTHER COUNSEL DESIGNATED BY LAW FOR PROCEDURAL OVERSIGHT
AND GOVERNANCE ADVICE.
(G) IF A BOARD MEMBER HAS A DISQUALIFYING INTEREST IN A MATTER
BEFORE THE BOARD, THE BOARD MEMBER SHALL SELF–RECUSE FROM
PARTICIPATION IN THAT MATTER IMMEDIATELY.
(H) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES TO GOVERN MEETING
FREQUENCY, QUORUM, NOTICE, RECORD KEEPING, PUBLIC ACCESS TO AGENDAS
AND MINUTES OF MEETINGS, SUBJECT TO SAFETY AND CONFIDENTIALITY
EXCEPTIONS, VOTE THRESHOLDS, AND OTHER ADMINISTRATION REQUIREMENTS.

HOUSE BILL 1339 17
(I) (1) THE BOARD MAY NOT OVERTURN OR VACATE A DETERMINATION
UNDER § 5–403 OR § 5–403.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) IF THE BOARD IDENTIFIES A PROCEDURAL ISSUE WITH RESPECT
TO THE HANDGUN ROSTER PROCESS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE BOARD MAY TAKE
THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS:
(I) SUBMIT A REASONABLE RECOMMENDATION FOR REMEDIAL
ACTION TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE SECRETARY; AND
(II) SEEK ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW IN ACCORDANCE WITH
TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(3) (I) THE BOARD MAY ADVISE AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS
TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE ON POLICY
MATTERS, REGULATORY PRIORITIES, AND TECHNICAL PROCEDURAL PROTOCOLS
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE MARYLAND STATE
POLICE SHALL CONSIDER THE BOARD’S RECOMMENDATIONS AND ADVICE IN GOOD
FAITH AND PROVIDE WRITTEN RESPONSE TO ANY BOARD RECOMMENDATIONS
WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME PERIOD.
(J) (1) IF THE BOARD IDENTIFIES A CREDIBLE TESTING CONCERN, SUCH
AS ANOMALOUS RESULTS, EVIDENCE OF PRODUCT VARIABILITY, OR SAFETY
CONCERNS, THE BOARD MAY REQUEST THAT THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE
CONDUCT ADDITIONAL TESTING AT THE EXPENSE OF THE PETITIONER UNDER §
5–403.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE DECISION ON WHETHER TO CONDUCT ADDITIONAL TESTING
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE MADE BY THE SECRETARY.
(K) THE BOARD SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND
THE MARYLAND STATE POLICE TO:
(1) ENSURE PROMPT PROCEDURAL COMPLIANCE UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE;
(2) PUBLISH AND ESTABLISH INTERIM PROCEDURES TO EFFECTUATE
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1339
5–406.
(a) (1) Except as provided in § 5–402 of this subtitle, a person may not
manufacture for distribution or sale a handgun that is not included on the handgun roster
in the State.
(2) A person may not sell or offer for sale in the State a handgun
manufactured after January 1, 1985, that is not included on the handgun roster.
(3) A person may not manufacture, sell, or offer for sale a handgun on
which the manufacturer’s identification mark or number is obliterated, removed, changed,
or otherwise altered.
(b) The Secretary may seek an order from a circuit court to permanently or
temporarily enjoin the willful and continuous manufacture, sale, or offer for sale, in
violation of this section, of a handgun that is not included on the handgun roster.
(c) (1) A person who manufactures a handgun for distribution or sale in
violation of this section is guilty of a felony and on conviction is subject to imprisonment
not exceeding 5 years or a fine not exceeding $10,000 or both for each violation.
(2) A person who sells or offers to sell a handgun in violation of this section
is guilty of a felony and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 5 years or a
fine not exceeding $2,500 or both for each violation.
(3) For purposes of this subsection, each handgun manufactured, sold, or
offered for sale in violation of this section is a separate violation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.